Hawaii statutes.
[§571-93] Duty to cooperate and disclose
information. (a) Both the deploying parent and other parent shall
cooperate with and provide information to each other in an effort to reach a
mutually agreeable resolution regarding custody of and visitation with the
child.

(b) A deploying parent shall provide a copy of
the deploying parent's orders to the other parent promptly before deployment.
Notification to the other parent shall be made at least sixty days prior to the
likely start of the deployment if known, or within ten days of the deploying
parent's receipt of the deploying parent's deployment orders. If fewer than
ten days' notice is received by the deploying parent, then notice shall be
given immediately upon receipt of the deployment orders.

(c) The court may consider the deploying
parent's timeliness in disclosing an impending deployment under this section to
the other parent when making any orders under this part, unless a delay or
failure to disclose was necessitated by valid military or operational security
concerns. [L 2010, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next